Wyoming, session 2025, HB0052.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 7-12-105 is created to read:

7-12-105. Appeals by the state in criminal cases.

(a) The state may, as a matter of right, appeal from
the following orders and judgments:

HB0052

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0128
(i) A final judgment of dismissal of an
indictment or information or any count thereof, including a
dismissal of a felony information following a decision not
to bind the defendant over for trial;

(ii) An order before trial that suppresses any
evidence, including physical or identification evidence or
evidence of a confession or admission;

(iii) An order granting a motion to withdraw a
plea of guilty or no contest;

(iv) An order arresting or modifying a judgment
of conviction;

(v) An order terminating the prosecution because
of a finding of double jeopardy or the denial of a speedy
trial;

(vi) An order granting a new trial;

(vii) An order holding a statute or any part of
a statute invalid;
HB0052

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0128

(viii) An order adjudicating that a defendant is
incompetent or has a mental illness or deficiency that
makes the defendant unfit to proceed;

(ix) An order adjudicating that a defendant
lacks the requisite mental capacity for the execution of
the defendant under W.S. 7-13-902;

(x) An order finding that a sentence is illegal
or that corrects an illegal sentence;

(xi) An order dismissing a charge under W.S.
6-2-602.

(b) In addition to any appeal permitted under
subsection (a) of this section, the state may seek
discretionary appellate review of any interlocutory order
entered before jeopardy attaches.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0052